Utah statutes.
26-6-19.   Venereal disease -- Examination and treatment of persons in prison or jail.

(1) All persons confined in any state, county, or city prison or jail shall be examined, and if infected, treated for venereal diseases by the health authorities. The prison authorities of every state, county, or city prison or jail shall make available to the health authorities such portion of the prison or jail as may be necessary for a clinic or hospital wherein all persons suffering with venereal disease at the time of the expiration of their terms of imprisonment, shall be isolated and treated at public expense until cured.

(2)  The department may require persons suffering with venereal disease at the time of the expiration of their terms of imprisonment to report for treatment to a licensed physician or submit to treatment provided at public expense in lieu of isolation. Nothing in this section shall interfere with the service of any sentence imposed by a court as a punishment for the commission of crime. 

